California statutes. Water Code
(c) The exclusion from the territory to be annexed of any lands described in the resolution of intention which in its opinion will not be benefited by being annexed to said improvement district; or

(d) The terms and conditions set forth in the resolution of intention or if none the board may adopt terms and conditions.

Said resolution proposing modification shall describe the proposed modifications and shall fix a time and place for a hearing by the board thereon. The board shall not order any modifications except after publication of the resolution proposing said modifications as provided in Section 36417.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

36431.

At the conclusion of the hearing on the resolution of intention and of the hearing, if any, upon proposed modifications the board may by resolution order the territory annexed to said improvement district upon the terms and conditions set forth in said resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

36432.

As an alternative procedure for the annexation of land to an improvement district, additional lands may be included within any improvement district by resolution of the board declaring the territory annexed after receipt by the board of written consent of the owners of all of the land to be annexed thereto which consent shall include the terms and conditions of annexation, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

36433.

The board may advance general funds of the district to accomplish an approved plan of works of an improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 104.)
-------------------------------------------

36434.

The board shall repay the district for any advance of funds with any money received which is authorized by law to be used for such a purpose including the proceeds of the sale of bonds and warrants authorized for the purposes of the improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1085.)
-------------------------------------------

36435.

After adopting the resolution ordering the improvement district formed, the board may provide for the issuance of warrants of the district for the improvement district in an amount not exceeding the estimate stated in the resolution ordering the improvement district formed, such warrants to be payable from assessments to be levied and collected upon the lands within said improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1085.)
-------------------------------------------

36436.

Warrants of said district for said improvement district shall be issued and sold in substantially the same manner and upon the same terms and conditions as warrants of the entire district, except that assessments for the payment of said warrants and the interest thereon shall be levied and collected from annual assessments to be levied upon and collected from lands within said improvement district. The warrants shall be issued in the name of the district and shall be designated “Warrants of ____ District for Improvement District No. __” and each warrant and all interest coupons thereon shall state that the assessment for the payment thereof shall be limited to annual assessments to be levied upon and collected from the lands within said improvement district, except to the extent that provision for such payment has been made by the board, as may be permitted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1085.)
-------------------------------------------

36437.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the provisions of this division applicable to warrants of the district and assessments therefor shall, so far as consistent with this chapter, apply to warrants of the district for an improvement district therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1085.)
-------------------------------------------

36438.

Pursuant to the procedure hereinafter set forth in this chapter, two or more existing coterminous improvement districts formed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may be consolidated into one improvement district. In such instance the consolidated improvement district may be designated in such manner as the board may designate. Any authorized but unissued bonds may be issued and sold as the bonds of the consolidated improvement district. Such bonds, as well as any funds on hand from bonds previously issued by any of the improvement districts consolidated into one improvement district as hereinafter provided or any other funds of any such improvement districts, shall be used in the manner provided by law for the original authorized purposes. However, any such use of funds shall be to accomplish the plan of works originally established or as subsequently amended.

To the extent assessment, standby charges, or other charges are necessary to be levied or collected by reason of any such improvement districts consolidated hereunder into one improvement district, such assessments, standby charges, or other charges may be collected by the consolidated improvement district provided for hereunder. Thereafter, the amount so collected shall be utilized to satisfy the obligations for which such assessments or standby charges were levied and collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36439.

In the event that the board determines it to be in the best interests of the district to consolidate any two or more existing coterminous improvement districts formed under this chapter, it may by resolution adopted by a four-fifths vote, declare its intention to consolidate such improvement districts. The resolution so adopted shall identify the improvement districts to be consolidated and shall set forth the total amount of authorized bonds, as well as the amount of outstanding bonds, of each of the improvement districts proposed to be consolidated, the purposes of each such improvement district, and the designation of the proposed consolidated improvement district. The resolution of intention shall set forth a legal description of the existing coterminous improvement districts to be consolidated and provide that notice be given in a manner provided in Section 36414. Additionally, the resolution shall fix a date, time, and place for a public hearing on the proposed consolidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36440.

At the conclusion of the hearing on the resolution of intention provided for in Section 36439, the board may adopt a resolution declaring the existing coterminous improvement districts described in the resolution of intention to be consolidated in one improvement district which shall be designated therein. The resolution shall contain the legal description thereof as well as a statement of the purposes of the consolidated improvement district. If the parent district has adopted the alternative method for the levy, collection and enforcement of district assessments by the county and is operating under the provisions of Part 7.5 (commencing with Section 37200) of this division, it shall file a statement as required by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900) of Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code. The resolution shall contain a determination that such consolidation is in the best interests of the present and future property owners and taxpayers. Any such resolution shall be subject to referendum held within the boundaries described in the resolution adopted as provided for herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36441.

The provisions of Sections 36438 to 36440, inclusive, are in the alternative to and shall not affect any existing provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36442.

After the formation of an improvement district, lands may be detached therefrom upon any terms and conditions as may be fixed by the board. If the board determines that territory should be detached from an improvement district, the board shall adopt a resolution of intention which shall state the following:

(a) The intention of the board to detach certain territory from Improvement District No. ____ of ____ District.

(b) That a map showing the exterior boundaries of the territory to be detached, which map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the area to be detached, is on file with the secretary of the district and is available for inspection by any person or persons interested.

(c) The terms and conditions of the proposed detachment.

(d) That the assessments for carrying out any purpose of the improvement district, including the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds or warrants outstanding, shall or shall not be continued to be levied to the extent and in the manner provided for in the District Reorganization Act of 1965 upon the lands in the territory to be detached.

(e) The time and place for a hearing by the board on the question of the detachment of such territory from the improvement district and any other matter relating to any of the foregoing.

(f) That at such time and place any persons interested, including persons owning land within the area to be detached from the improvement district, may appear and be heard. Notice of such hearing shall be given in the same manner as provided in Section 36414.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36443.

At the time and place fixed, or at any time and place to which the hearing is continued, the board shall hold the hearing provided for by such resolution of intention. At the hearing any person interested, including all persons owning land in the district or in the territory to be detached from the improvement district, may appear and be heard concerning any matters set forth in the resolution of intention or any matters material thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36444.

At the hearing, the board may adopt a resolution proposing modifications relating to any or all of the following:

(a) Modification of the boundaries of the territory to be detached.

(b) The exclusion from the territory to be detached of any lands described in the resolution of intention which, in its opinion, will be benefited by remaining part of the improvement district.

(c) The terms and conditions set forth in the resolution of intention, or if none, the board may adopt terms and conditions.

Such resolution proposing modifications shall describe the proposed modifications and shall fix a time and place for a hearing by the board thereon. The board shall not order any modifications except after publication of the resolution proposing the modifications as provided in Section 36417.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36445.

At the conclusion of the hearing on the resolution of intention and of the hearing, if any, upon proposed modifications, the board may by resolution order the territory detached from the improvement district upon the terms and conditions set forth in the resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

36446.

As an alternative procedure for the detachment of land from an improvement district, lands may be detached from any improvement district by resolution of the board declaring the territory detached after receipt by the board of written consent of the owners of all of the land to be detached therefrom, which consent shall include the terms and conditions of annexation, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.95. Alternative Provisions for the Issuance of Bonds of Improvement Districts [36447. - 36447.15.]

36447.

This chapter shall apply to the Irvine Ranch Water District, the Santa Margarita Water District, and the Moulton-Niguel Water District. As used in this chapter, “district” means the Irvine Ranch Water District, the Santa Margarita Water District, or the Moulton-Niguel Water District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 398, Sec. 2.   Effective July 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

36447.1.

Bonds for two or more improvement districts of the district may be issued and sold as consolidated bonds of the district in substantially the same manner and upon the same terms and conditions as bonds of the entire district, subject to all of the following conditions:

(a) The consolidated bonds shall specify the included amount of par value issued on behalf of each improvement district, and the remaining authorized bonds of each improvement district shall be reduced by its respective included amount so specified.

(b) In advance of the sale of consolidated bonds, the board shall find that the sale of the included bonds as consolidated bonds shall not increase the cost that any improvement district will pay for its included bonds over the cost it would have paid had its bonds been sold separately.

(c) The maximum portion of any assessment for the payment of each series of the consolidated bonds and the interest thereon that may be obtained from annual assessments to be levied upon and collected from lands within each improvement district shall be the proportion which the par value of the included bonds of the improvement district bears to the total par value of that series of the consolidated bonds.

(d) The board shall include in the resolution providing for issuance of each series of consolidated bonds provisions to insure that assessments to be levied upon and collected from lands within each included improvement district shall be limited to the amount required to pay the improvement district’s proportional share as determined under subdivision (c), except to the extent that provision for payment of that share has been made by the board, as may be permitted by law, and that the improvement district’s share shall not be collected or paid for, or pledged to the payment of, any other included improvement district’s proportional share.

(e) The board shall include in the resolution providing for issuance of each series of consolidated bonds provisions to insure that the proceeds of the consolidated bonds disbursed into the fund provided for in Section 35998.1 are apportioned within the fund according to each included improvement district’s share determined under subdivision (c), so that separate apportionments are accounted for and used for the purposes of the respective improvement districts in the manner contemplated by Section 36427.

(f) The board shall include in the resolution providing for issuance of each series of consolidated bonds provisions to insure that any bond reserve fund established pursuant to Sections 35910 and 35911 is established proportionately for each of the included improvement districts and, to the extent the fund must be used, that moneys in the fund shall be disbursed only to the extent of the share apportioned therein to the improvement district on whose behalf it is disbursed, and that any charges or annual assessments used to establish the bond reserve fund shall be set aside within the bond reserve fund only to the account of the improvement district from which they were obtained.

(g) If the consolidated bonds include provisions for redemption, the board shall also include in the resolution providing for issuance provisions to insure that any moneys collected from within the improvement districts to establish a redemption fund shall be limited to each improvement district’s proportional share of the consolidated bonds as determined in subdivision (c).

(h) The consolidated bonds shall be issued in the name of the district and, if general obligation bonds, shall be designated “Bonds of ____ Water District,” and each bond shall state that it is issued on behalf of the included improvement districts whose respective shares of the par value shall be specified, and shall state that the assessment for payment thereof shall be limited to annual assessments to be levied upon and collected from the lands within each of the specified improvement districts in the stated proportions of the total par value, except to the extent that provision for that payment has been made by the board as may be permitted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

36447.2.

The provisions of Chapters 2 (commencing with Section 35950) and 3 (commencing with Section 36150) shall apply to the consolidated bonds to the extent they may be made applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

36447.3.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to preserve the status of the improvement districts’ bonds which have been consolidated, so that the bonds shall continue to constitute “indebtedness approved by the voters” pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and shall reduce accordingly the remaining authorized bonds of the improvement districts. In order to preserve the status of the included bonds, the provisions of this chapter shall be interpreted and applied in a manner so that the burden on the land within the improvement districts does not result in any increase in the amount of assessments that will be levied to pay each improvement district’s proportionate share of the principal and interest payments with respect to each series of the consolidated bonds, over the amount it would have paid had its bonds been sold under other provisions of law. The added financial flexibility included in this chapter has been granted to the district only on the basis that the consolidating of improvement district bond authorizations and the permission to utilize negotiated sale of bonds, variable interest rates, refunding of existing improvement district bonds by exchange, or otherwise, and the other features of this chapter shall be authorized only to the extent that the burden upon the property owners of the improvement districts is not increased.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

36447.4.

Before adopting a resolution approving the issuance of any consolidated bonds pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 36150), the board shall adopt a resolution of intention, which shall approve a proposed resolution of issuance and state the time and place for a hearing by the board on the proposed resolution of issuance. Notice of the hearing shall be given by publishing a copy of the resolution of intention in a newspaper of general circulation published in Orange County pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, with the first publication to be at least 14 days prior to the time fixed for the hearing. Notice shall also be given by posting a copy of the resolution of intention in three public places within each improvement district whose bonds are proposed to be included in the consolidated bonds, for at least 14 days prior to the time fixed for the hearing. No notice other than that required by this section need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

36447.5.

At the time and place so fixed or at any time or place to which the hearing is continued, the board shall hold the hearing provided by the resolution of intention at which hearing any person interested, including all persons owning land in the improvement districts whose bonds are proposed to be included in the consolidated bonds or any person otherwise interested in the consolidated bonds, may appear and be heard concerning any matter set forth in the resolution of intention and proposed resolution of issuance or any matters material thereto, including the question of whether the burden on the lands of any of the included improvement districts would be increased.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

36447.6.

If the board finds that protests against the proposed issuance of any consolidated bonds are signed by the owners of more than one-half of the area of the land in any improvement district whose bonds are proposed to be included in the consolidated bonds, all further proceedings under the resolution of intention are barred, and no new resolution of intention for the issuance of consolidated bonds which would include bonds for the improvement district may be passed within six months after the decision of the board on the hearing, unless the protests are overruled by an affirmative vote of four-fifths of the members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

36447.7.

At the conclusion of the hearing, in the absence of a majority protest pursuant to Section 36447.6, the board shall adopt a resolution making the finding required by subdivision (b) of Section 36447.1, and, if any of the features provided for by Sections 36447.9 and 36447.10 are to be included in the consolidated bonds, also making a finding that the features so utilized will not increase the cost that any improvement district will pay over the cost that it would have paid had the bonds been sold without those features. All findings required by this section shall be supported by substantial evidence, which shall mean evidence that is reasonable, credible, and of solid value and ponderable legal significance, based upon the record as a whole. The findings shall also be made as to any modifications made by the board in the terms of the proposed resolution of issuance as a result of the hearing. If the board makes the foregoing findings in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the board may adopt the proposed resolution of issuance in final form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

36447.9.

The board may, if it determines that to do so would produce a lower interest cost on the bonds, sell bonds at private sale without advertising for bids.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

36447.10.

The board may provide for the bonds to bear a variable interest rate, for the manner and intervals in which the rate shall vary, and for the dates on which the interest shall be payable.

The variable rate shall on no day exceed the maximum rate permitted for bonds of the district on that day by Section 53541 of the Government Code or any other applicable provisions of law. However, the variable interest rate so permitted may on any day exceed that maximum rate if the interest paid on the bonds from their date of original issuance to that day does not exceed the total interest which would have been permitted to have been paid on the bonds if the bonds had borne interest at all times from the date of issuance to that day at the maximum rate permitted from time to time by Section 53541 of the Government Code or any other applicable provisions of law.

The district may enter into arrangements for the remarketing or resale of the bonds, the purchase and holding of the bonds, liquidity support, debt service insurance or other credit enhancement, and such other matters related to the bonds as the board determines to be necessary or appropriate. The board may provide for the payment of the fees and costs of those arrangements from the proceeds of the bonds or from any other lawfully available source designated by the board, or from any combination thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 92, Sec. 1.   Effective June 25, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

36447.11.

Refunding bonds issued under Article 6 (commencing with Section 36060) of Chapter 2 may be issued in the manner set forth in this chapter regardless of whether or not the bonds being refunded were issued in the manner set forth in this chapter. The par value of each improvement district’s refunding bonds included in the consolidated refunding bonds shall be only sufficient to provide for the refunding of that improvement district’s bonds to be refunded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 645, Sec. 3.   Effective September 17, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

36447.12.

In lieu of refunding outstanding bonds by defeasing or calling for redemption, the board may also refund under Article 6 (commencing with Section 36060) of Chapter 2 by purchasing the bonds to be refunded with proceeds of the refunding bonds or by acquiring the bonds to be refunded and exchanging them for the refunding bonds, in either case in a negotiated transaction with the bondholder or through an intermediary agent of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 645, Sec. 4.   Effective September 17, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

36447.14.

All acts and proceedings taken prior to the effective date of this chapter, which would be in accordance with this chapter if taken after the effective date, are hereby confirmed, validated, and declared legally effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective September 11, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

36447.15.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 36447, this section applies only to the Irvine Ranch Water District and the Santa Margarita Water District.

(2) As used in this section, “district” means the Irvine Ranch Water District and the Santa Margarita Water District.

(b) To provide credit enhancement, liquidity support, or both, in connection with, or incidental to, the issuance or carrying by the district of any general obligation bonds for improvement districts or consolidated general obligation bonds for improvement districts, the district may pledge and apply all or any part of the revenues of the district to the payment
 or security of any or all of the principal, redemption price, and purchase price of those bonds, and the interest thereon, in the manner and upon terms that the board may deem advisable.

(c) In connection with the pledge, the board may provide in the resolution, order, indenture, trust agreement, loan agreement, lease, installment sale agreement, pledge agreement, or other document in which the pledge is provided for or created, any covenants, promises, restrictions, and provisions that the district may deem necessary or desirable, including, but not limited to, covenants, promises, restrictions, and provisions relating to the use of bond proceeds, the maintenance, operation, and preservation of the district’s facilities, any rates and charges to be established and collected by the district, including rates and charges for the services or products furnished or provided by the district’s facilities, the incurring of additional indebtedness
 payable from the revenues, and the establishment, maintenance, and use of reserve funds, sinking funds, interest and redemption funds, maintenance and operation funds, and other special funds for the payment or security of any or all of the principal, redemption price, and purchase price of bonds and the interest thereon.

(d) For the purposes of carrying out this section, the board may exercise, but shall not be limited to exercising, the powers specified in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(e) Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 5450) of Division 6 of Title 1 of the Government Code shall govern the creation of pledges authorized by this section.

(f) Prior to exercising the authority granted pursuant to this section,
 the board shall adopt criteria to govern its determinations to use pledges pursuant to this section. The criteria may include, but are not limited to, evaluating the use of a pledge in lieu of or in combination with other credit enhancement and liquidity options available to the board.

(g) The authority granted by this section is in addition to, and not in derogation of, any authority granted by other provisions of law relating to the payment of the district’s general obligation bonds from the proceeds of assessments to be levied upon and collected from lands of any improvement district or relating to the levy and collection of the assessments. This section does not affect any other law authorizing or providing for the issuance or carrying of bonds by the district. This section shall be deemed to provide a complete and supplemental method for exercising the powers authorized by this section, and shall be deemed supplemental to the powers
 conferred by other applicable laws.

(h) On or before January 1, 2014, each district shall submit a report to the Treasurer, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Secretary of the Senate describing the district’s use, if any, of the authority granted pursuant to this section. The report shall include all of the following:

(1) A description of each pledge made pursuant to this section.

(2) A discussion of the amounts from pledged district revenues, paid pursuant to a pledge, that are
 expended to offset any insufficiency in amounts required for the payment of principal, redemption price, interest, or purchase price.

(3) A discussion of any benefits or savings to the district associated with the use of the pledge made pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 624, Sec. 1.   (SB 613)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Improvement Districts [36450. - 36453.]

36450.

Improvement districts may be formed in districts in the same manner as improvement districts are formed in irrigation districts. When formed, such improvement districts shall be governed in the same manner as improvement districts in irrigation districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

36451.

The board of directors of a district shall have the same rights, powers, duties and responsibilities with respect to the formation and government of improvement districts in districts as the board of directors of an irrigation district has with respect to improvement districts in irrigation districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

36452.

The board shall also have, in addition to its other powers, the same powers with respect to improvement districts in districts as the board of directors of an irrigation district has with respect to distribution districts in irrigation districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

36453.

Assessments in an improvement district in a district shall be levied, collected and enforced at the same time and in as nearly the same manner as practicable as annual taxes for purposes of the district in which formed, except that the assessment shall be made in the same manner as provided with respect to improvement districts or distribution districts in irrigation districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Alternative Provisions for the Consolidation of Coterminous Improvement Districts [36454. - 36454.4.]

36454.

This chapter provides an alternative method for the consolidation of coterminous improvement districts formed pursuant to Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 36410) of this part. This chapter shall not apply to or affect any other provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

36454.1.

Pursuant to the procedure set forth in this chapter, two or more existing coterminous improvement districts formed pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 36410) of this part may be consolidated into one improvement district. In such instance the consolidated improvement district may be designated in such manner as the board may designate. Any authorized but unissued bonds of any of the coterminous improvement districts may be issued and sold as the bonds of the consolidated improvement district. Such bonds, as well as any funds on hand from bonds previously issued by any of the improvement districts consolidated into one improvement district as hereinafter provided or any other funds of any such improvement districts, shall be used in the manner provided by law for the original authorized purposes. However, any such use of funds shall be to accomplish the plan of works originally established or as subsequently amended.

Any bonds which were issued by any of the coterminous improvement districts prior to their consolidation and which remain outstanding at the time of consolidation shall be assumed by and become the liability of the consolidated improvement district.

To the extent assessment, standby charges, or other charges are necessary to be levied or collected by reason of any such improvement districts consolidated hereunder into one improvement district, such assessment, standby charges, or other charges may be collected by the consolidated improvement district provided for hereunder. Thereafter, the amount so collected shall be utilized to satisfy the obligations for which such assessments or standby charges were levied and collected, except that any amount over and above that necessary to satisfy said obligations may be used for any of the purposes of the consolidated improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

36454.2.

For purposes of Section 2270 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, bonds authorized by any of the coterminous improvement districts which remain outstanding or unissued at the time the districts are consolidated shall be treated as having been authorized by the consolidated district. Further, for purposes of Section 2270 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, bonds authorized by the voters of the coterminous improvement districts which remain outstanding or unissued at the time the districts are consolidated shall be treated as having been authorized by the voters of the consolidated improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

36454.3.

In the event that the board determines it to be in the best interests of the district to consolidate any two or more existing coterminous improvement districts formed under Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 36410) of this part, it may, by resolution adopted by a four-fifths vote, declare its intention to consolidate such improvement districts. The resolution so adopted shall identify the improvement districts to be consolidated and shall set forth the total amount of authorized bonds, as well as the amount of outstanding bonds, of each of the improvement districts proposed to be consolidated, the purposes of each such improvement district, and the designation of the proposed consolidated improvement district. The resolution of intention shall set forth a legal description of the existing coterminous improvement districts to be consolidated and provide that notice be given in a manner provided in Section 36414. Additionally, the resolution shall fix a date, time, and place for a public hearing on the proposed consolidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

36454.4.

At the conclusion of the hearing on the resolution of intention provided for in Section 36454.3, the board may adopt a resolution declaring the existing coterminous improvement districts described in the resolution of intention to be consolidated in one improvement district which shall be designated therein. The resolution shall contain the legal description thereof as well as a statement of the purposes of the consolidated improvement district. If the parent district has adopted the alternative method for the levy, collection and enforcement of district assessment by the county and is operating under the provisions of Part 7.5 (commencing with Section 37200) of this division, it shall file a statement as required by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900) of Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code. The resolution shall contain a determination that such consolidation is in the best interests of the present and future property owners and taxpayers. Any such resolution shall be subject to referendum held within the boundaries described in the resolution adopted as provided for herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Adoption of Improvement Acts [36455. - 36458.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. Authorization of Improvements [36455. - 36455.4.]

36455.

Whenever, in the opinion of the board, the public interest or convenience may require, the board may order the acquisition or construction in, under, or upon the whole or any portion of any one or more of the streets or public places of the district, or any property or rights-of-way owned by the district, of any work or improvement for the production, storage, transmission and distribution of water for irrigation, domestic, industrial and municipal purposes, or for collecting, treating, and disposing of sewage, waste and storm waters, and provide that the cost thereof shall be assessed upon any district to be assessed therefor, which district need not be composed of lands contiguous to each other.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36455.1.

The work or improvement shall be done and the cost thereof assessed and collected in accordance with the procedures of the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), or the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

36455.2.

Such acts or any of them may be used in the discretion of the board of directors in the construction of any work to be done or improvements made under this act and in the levying of assessments and reassessments and the issuing of bonds to pay for costs and expenses of the work and improvements done or to be done hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36455.3.

As additional notice a certified copy of any assessment and the diagram attached thereto issued under any of said acts shall be recorded in the office of the county surveyor if the improvement district or any part thereof is in unincorporated territory and with the superintendent of streets of the city or cities if the improvement district or any part thereof is in incorporated territory and shall remain an official record in the office in which it may be filed. Such filing, however, shall not affect or qualify the district record thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

36455.4.
